District of Columbia statutes.
2-1803.02

Right to administrative appeal and costs of appeal.

Except as provided in § 2-1831.16, any person aggrieved by an order of an administrative law judge or attorney examiner issued pursuant to subchapters I and II of this chapter, or the Mayor, may appeal to the reviewing agency specified in § 2-1803.01. The costs of any appeal, including, but not limited to, the expense of providing a transcript of the hearing, shall be borne by the appellant unless excused by the Mayor pursuant to rules issued by the Mayor.

History

Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 302, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(l), 38 DCR 314
Mar. 6, 2002, D.C. Law 14-76, § 23(b)(2), 48 DCR 11442

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2722.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-76 substituted “Except as provided in § 2-1831.16, any” for “Any” in the first sentence.